Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.390

Contracts or work on cost basis for emergency management activities.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

The governor, or upon his or her direction, the director, or any political subdivision of the state, is authorized to contract with any person, firm, corporation, or entity to provide construction or work on a cost basis to be used in emergency management functions or activities as defined in *RCW 38.52.010(1) or as hereafter amended, said functions or activities to expressly include natural disasters, as well as all other emergencies of a type contemplated by RCW 38.52.110, 38.52.180, 38.52.195, 38.52.205, 38.52.207, 38.52.220 and 38.52.390. All funds received for purposes of RCW 38.52.110, 38.52.180, 38.52.195, 38.52.205, 38.52.207, 38.52.220 and 38.52.390, whether appropriated funds, local funds, or from whatever source, may be used to pay for the construction, equipment, or work contracted for under this section.

[1986 c 266 s 42; 1984 c 38 s 40; 1971 ex.s. c 8 s 6.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 38.52.010 was alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k), changing subsection (1) to subsection (4). RCW 38.52.010 was subsequently amended by 2017 c 312 s 3, changing subsection (4) to subsection (5). RCW 38.52.010 was subsequently amended by 2019 c 207 s 1 and by 2019 c 471 s 2, changing subsection (5) to subsection (8). RCW 38.52.010 was amended by 2022 c 203 s 2, changing subsection (8) to subsection (12).

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.